Illinois, session 104th, SB3602.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Prohibition on Bots Purchasing Tickets Act. 6    Section 5. Definition. As used in this Act, "bot" means 7any automated software program that performs automatic and 8repetitive tasks and is designed to impersonate or replicate 9human activity online. "Bot" does not include auto fill or 10password management features built into an Internet browser or 11provided through separate software. 12    Section 10. Prohibition on automated online ticket 13purchasing. 14    (a) A person shall not use or create a bot, or employ any 15other method, to: 16        (1) purchase tickets in excess of posted limits for an 17    online ticket sale; 18        (2) use multiple Internet protocol addresses, multiple 19    purchaser accounts, or multiple email addresses to 20    purchase tickets in excess of the posted limit for any 21    single online ticket sale; or 22        (3) circumvent or disable an electronic queue, waiting   SB3602- 2 -LRB104 19385 SPS 32833 b1    period, pre-sale code, or other sales volume limitation 2    system associated with an online ticket sale. 3    (b) An owner or operator of a place of entertainment that 4sells tickets to events, and any agent who conducts or 5facilitates those sales, shall report any known violation 6described in subsection (a) to the Attorney General within a 7reasonable period of time after discovery of the violation. 8The report shall include: 9        (1) a description of the violation; 10        (2) any available information about the individuals or 11    entities involved in the violation; and 12        (3) any measures taken or planned to be taken to 13    prevent further violations. 14    Section 15. Enforcement by Attorney General. 15    (a) The Attorney General may investigate a claim that a 16person violated this Act. 17    (b) If the Attorney General concludes that a person is 18violating this Act, the Attorney General may bring an action 19in the name of the People of the State to restrain or enjoin 20the person from violating this Act. 21    (c) In addition to bringing an action for injunctive 22relief under this Act, the Attorney General may seek 23restitution and petition a circuit court for the assessment of 24a civil penalty as provided by this Section. 25    (d) A person who knowingly violates Section 10 is liable   SB3602- 3 -LRB104 19385 SPS 32833 b1for a civil penalty of not more than $2,000 for each violation. 2    (e) Every ticket transaction in which a ticket is acquired 3to be sold in violation of Section 10 constitutes a separate 4violation for purposes of assessing a civil penalty. 5    (f) The Attorney General may recover all reasonable costs 6of bringing an action under this Section, including court 7costs, reasonable attorney's fees, and investigation costs. 8    Section 90. The Ticket Sale and Resale Act is amended by 9adding Section 1.6 as follows: 10    (815 ILCS 414/1.6 new)11    Sec. 1.6. Consumer protections for ticket sales.12    (a) As used in this Section:13    "Operator" means a person that owns, operates, or controls 14a place of entertainment or that promotes or produces 15entertainment and that sells a ticket to an entertainment 16event as the first sale of the ticket.17    "Ticket issuer" means any person who makes tickets 18available, directly or indirectly, to the general public, and 19may include:20        (1) the operator of the venue;21        (2) the sponsor or promoter of an event;22        (3) a sports team participating in an event or a 23    league whose teams are participating in an event;24        (4) a theater company, musical group, or similar   SB3602- 4 -LRB104 19385 SPS 32833 b1    participant in an event; or2        (5) an agent for any such person.3    "Ticket resale marketplace" means a person that operates a 4platform or exchange for the resale of tickets between third 5parties or between the ticket resale marketplace and a third 6party. "Ticket resale marketplace" includes a ticket issuer 7only to the extent the ticket issuer is acting to facilitate 8the resale of tickets between third parties or between the 9ticket issuer, acting as a ticket resale marketplace, and a 10third party.11    "Ticket reseller" means a person engaged in the resale of 12tickets.13    "URL" means a uniform resource locator for a website on 14the Internet.15    (b) A ticket resale marketplace or ticket reseller shall 16not:17        (1) use a name, graphic, logo, image, or other 18    intellectual property of an artist, team, event venue, or 19    event organizer, including any proprietary resemblance, in 20    its promotional materials, social media promotions, paid 21    advertising, or URLs, in a manner that could reasonably be 22    expected to mislead a consumer as to the identity of the 23    seller when buying a ticket, unless it has the express 24    written consent of the artist, team, event venue, or event 25    organizer; or26        (2) state or imply that the ticket resale marketplace,   SB3602- 5 -LRB104 19385 SPS 32833 b1    ticket reseller, or its website is affiliated with or 2    endorsed by an artist, team, event venue, or event 3    organizer, including by using words like "official" in 4    promotional materials, social media promotions, search 5    engine optimization or monetization, paid advertising, or 6    URLs, unless it has the express written consent of the 7    artist, team, event venue, or event organizer.8    (c) An operator or ticket issuer shall disclose the number 9of tickets for an event that are withheld from sale any time it 10offers tickets for that event for sale.